Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF362.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1944YH (1) 91 ll/js H.F. 362 Section 1. Section 331.441, subsection 2, paragraph b, Code 1 2025, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 2 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (21) Funding and refunding of emergency 3 medical services as defined in section 147A.1, subsection 5. 4